Oklahoma, session 2025, SB855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1731, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 176, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1731), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1731. A. Larceny of merchandise held for sale in


retail or wholesale establishments shall be punishable as follows:


1. For the first or second conviction, in the event the value


of the goods, edible meat, or other corporeal property which has


been taken is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00), the person shall be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a term


not exceeding to exceed thirty (30) days, and by a fine not less

Req. No. 945 Page 1


than Ten Dollars ($10.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00); provided, for the first or second conviction, in the


event more than one item of goods, edible meat, or other corporeal


property has been taken, punishment shall be by imprisonment in the


county jail for a term not to exceed thirty (30) days, and by a fine


not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred


Dollars ($500.00);


2. For a third or subsequent conviction, in the event the value


of the goods, edible meat, or other corporeal property which has


been taken is less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00), the person shall be guilty of a


misdemeanor and shall be punished punishable by imprisonment in the


county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year, and by a fine not


exceeding to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00);


3. In the event the value of the goods, edible meat, or other


corporeal property is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) Five Hundred


Dollars ($500.00) or more but less than Two Thousand Five Hundred


Dollars ($2,500.00), the person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of


a felony and shall be punished punishable by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed


two (2) years, and by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00);


4. In the event the value of the goods, edible meat, or other


corporeal property is Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)

Req. No. 945 Page 2


or more but less than Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), the


person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony and shall be


punished punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections for a term not to exceed five (5) years, and by a


fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); or


5. In the event the value of the goods, edible meat, or other


corporeal property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more,


the person shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony and shall


be punished punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the


Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed eight (8) years,


and by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($ 1,000.00)


($1,000.00).


B. When three or more separate offenses under this section are


committed within a one-hundred-eighty-day period, the value of the


goods, edible meat, or other corporeal property involved in each


larceny offense may be aggregated to determine the total value for


purposes of determining the appropriate punishment under this


section.


C. In the event any person engages in conduct that is a


violation of this section in concert with at least one other


individual, such person shall be liable for the aggregate value of


all items taken by all individuals. Such person may also be subject


to the penalties set forth in Section 421 of this title, which shall


be in addition to any other penalties provided for by law.

Req. No. 945 Page 3


D. Any person convicted pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall also be ordered to pay restitution to the victim as


provided in Section 991f of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-945 CN 1/19/2025 5:44:41 AM





































Req. No. 945 Page 4